Utah statutes.
58-39a-5.5.   Term of certificate -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Each certificate issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  Each certificate automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the certificate unless renewed by the certified ADR provider in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

